









Wafer Works Corporation - About Us - About Us





















Home
Sitemap



English


English繁體中文简体中文日本語 
















About UsAbout UsWafer Works' StoryLocationsProductsProducts OverviewPolished Silicon WafersEpitaxial WafersTechnologyTechnologyQualityQuality AssuranceCertificationsEnvironmental, Safety and Health AssuranceEnergy PolicyInvestor RelationsFinancial InformationAnnual ReportsCorporate GovernanceShareholder ServicesPress CenterInvestor FAQContact IRCSRCorporate Social Responsibility PolicyChairman's TalkSustainable OperationEnvironmental FriendlyEmployee CarePartnershipSocial ConcernStakeholder AreaCorporate Social Responsibility ReportCSR Assurance StatementCareerJoin Wafer WorksContact UsContact Us 

 

About Us


About UsWafer Works' StoryLocations 




Home›About Us›About Us
About Us





Company Profile




Milestone




Philosophy





	Wafer Works offers a broad range of wafer solutions for customers through vertically integrated product-lines of single crystal ingot, polished and Epi wafers. Wafer Works is a world-class electronic materials supplier and specializing in manufacturing highly doped silicon wafers, which are widely used in power semiconductor devices. We are able to provide our customers high quality semiconductor polished and Epi wafers for semiconductors, Si wafers for solar cells, and sapphire substrates for LEDs.

	Industry Leader in Creating and Developing Research Concepts

	Wafer Works is committed to staying one-step ahead of the curve, creating innovative wafer solutions for global customers. Wafer Works Corporation was the first company in Taiwan to successfully manufacture a highly doped 8-inch monocrystalline ingot through silicon crystal growth. As an innovative industry leader in manufacturing and development we are always striving to meet future technology trends.

	Adapting to the Rapidly Growing Market of Energy-Saving Products

	Wafer Works is committed to be the world leader in green manufacturing. We have incorporated environmental safety conduct into every step of our manufacturing process. While we are proud of our energy reduction achievements, we will accomplish more. In the fast-pace high-tech, dynamic global market, where environmental issues are becoming a greater concern; the demand for low energy consumption consumer electronic devices and alternative energy industries continue to grow. To address the market demands for smaller and energy effective electronics and to protect and preserve the environment, Wafer Works has been investing heavily in alternative energy-saving industries, such as PV and LED technologies.

	Excellent Customer Service

	To better reach and serve global clients, Wafer Works has set up over ten sales representatives around the world and four advanced manufacturing facilities across Taiwan and China. Wafer Works vows to keep its world-class technologies on the cutting-edge and focuses on developing new products to meet or esceed customer’s existing and future needs. We intend to develop successful win-win relationships with all customers, and measure our success, based on their success.





					 •2012




						‧



				Wafer Works was certified for PAS2050 and ISO14067.



				 

				 

				 




					 •2011




						‧





Corporate headquarters moved to Longtan Fab.





				 

				‧


					Wafer Works Optronics Corp. was listed on the GreTai Securities Market in Taiwan




				 

				 

				 




 •2010




						‧





						Wafer Works Yangmei Fab Phase 1.5 expansion in April, the 200mm monthly output was 60Kpcs.






					 



					‧





							Wafer Works Longtan Fab Ground Breaking in April







					 



					 



					 





					 •2008




						‧






							Wafer Works' consolidated revenue reached a milestone of NT$10 billion.







					 



					‧






								Wafer Works Optronics Corp. has successfully grown sapphire ingots and has moved into mass production stage. It has become one of the few manufacturers that own vertical integrated production lines between sapphire ingots, polished sapphire substrates and patterned sapphire substrates (PSS).








					 




						‧










											Wafer Works Optronics
										Corp. completed larger size diameter (4") patterned sapphire substrate research and development plan.









				 


					‧




						Solargiga Energy Holdings Ltd., was successfully listed on

						the Main Board of Hong Kong Stock Exchange.





				 

				 

				 




 •2007




						‧







								Accredited as being part of "Asia's 200 Best Under A Billion" by the internationally renowned, Forbes Magazine.








					 



					‧





							Established Solargiga Energy Holdings Ltd. by cooperating with Jinzhou Yangguang Energy Co. Ltd., to expand production in solar wafers/ingots.







					 




						‧





						Established Wafer Works Optronics Corp. to produce sapphire substrates for uses in blue/white lighting.





				 


					 



					 





 •2006




						‧








									Established Wafer Works Epitaxial Corp. for manufacturing Epitaxial wafers.









					 



					‧






								Became 100% owner of You-Hua New Energy Co., to satisfy the growing demand of solar applications.








					 




						‧






							Winner of the New Leading Product Award on highly doped arsenic “Low-resistance Silicon Substrate”from Taiwan Industrial Development Bureau of the MOEA.






				 


					‧



					Successfully grew 8-inch highly doped aresnic and highly doped phosphorus ingots.




				 

				 

				 



 •2005



						‧









										Received the product development reward on “Large size (4”) Sapphire Substrate Development Project” from the MOEA.









				 


					‧







									Cooperated with a distinguished university in “Sapphire Substrate for used in blue/white Lighting Manufacturing Project”.








				 


					 



					 





 •2004




						‧










											Became 75% shareholder of Jinghwa, which was renamed to Wafer Works (Shanghai) Corp.











					 



					‧









											Successfully developed 2-inch Sapphire Substrate for used in blue/white LED. 










				 


					 



					 





					 •2003




						‧











												Received the government research reward for the project entitled “SOI Wafers for MEMS and Smart Power Semiconductor Devices”.











				 


					 



					 





 •2002




						‧












													Wafer Works Corporation approved by Taiwan Gri Tai Securities Exchange (OTC) to IPO.












				 


					 



					 





 •2000




						‧













														Received recognition from M.O.E.A. for High Tech Business.














					 



					‧








										Successfully grew 6-inch highly doped antimony ingots.









				 


					 



					 





 •1999




						‧














															Helitek received the 1999 Environment Achievement Award from Alameda County, CA.















					 



					‧








										Grand Opening Ceremony of Yang Mei Fab.










					 




						‧






							Established operation and headquarters in Yang Mei, Taiwan.






				 


					 



					 





 •1998




						‧















																Received recognition from M.O.E.A. for High Tech Business.















				 


					 



					 





 •1997




						‧



				Merged with Helitek Company Ltd.




	 

	Vision 


		To become the customer-centered solution provider of Semiconductor materials.


	Values 



			Founded on Integrity

			Partnership and Teamwork

			Customer Oriented Execution

			Committed to Quality Improvement

			To Create To Share



	 

	 

	 

	 








    	Copyright© Wafer Works Corporation 2012. All Rights Reserved.
        Term of Use












Wafer Works Corporation - Products - Epitaxial Wafers





















Home
Sitemap



English


English繁體中文简体中文日本語 
















About UsAbout UsWafer Works' StoryLocationsProductsProducts OverviewPolished Silicon WafersEpitaxial WafersTechnologyTechnologyQualityQuality AssuranceCertificationsEnvironmental, Safety and Health AssuranceEnergy PolicyInvestor RelationsFinancial InformationAnnual ReportsCorporate GovernanceShareholder ServicesPress CenterInvestor FAQContact IRCSRCorporate Social Responsibility PolicyChairman's TalkSustainable OperationEnvironmental FriendlyEmployee CarePartnershipSocial ConcernStakeholder AreaCorporate Social Responsibility ReportCSR Assurance StatementCareerJoin Wafer WorksContact UsContact Us 

 

Products


Products OverviewPolished Silicon WafersEpitaxial Wafers 




Home›Products›Epitaxial Wafers
Epitaxial Wafers





Specifications




Manufacturing Process





	Wafer Works also provides high-quality 4" - 8" epitaxial wafers and buried layer epitaxial process services, meeting customer's power device and CMOS demands and offering one stop-shopping services.

	Specifications of Silicon Epi-Substrate




Service type

Diameter
				(mm)

Epitaxial Thickness
				(μm)

Resistivity Range
				  (ohm．cm)



				Silicon Epitaxial Wafer

				100/125/150/200

				2.00~150

				0.05~60



				Buried EPI Service

				150/200

				2.00~20

				0.10~50




	 








01


Crystal Growth

We use the Czochralski (CZ) method to grow both p-type and n-type dislocation-free silicon ingots with <100>, <111> or <100> orientation. The diameters of the ingots are 100mm, 125mm, 150mm, and 200mm. The dopant types used, and the matching resistivity ranges for each dopant are listed in the product tables. For the p-type boron doped ingots, the lowest resistivity that can be obtained for an ingot is 0.0006 ohm．cm. For an n-type ingot, the lowest resistivity obtained by doping with red-phosphorus is 0.0011 ohm．cm. To ensure high gettering ability and mechanical strength, the oxygen contents of the ingots are regulated. We also pay special attention to improve radial uniformity and to minimize the as-grown defects, such as COP, swirl and dislocation loops in an ingot.  








02


Slicing

Slicing follows the process of cutting the ingot into thin wafer slices. Wafer Works used cutting-edge wire and I.D. saws that are operated by experienced and well-trained operators to produce high quality wafers. The techniques with low kerf loss are applied to achieve thin wafers and help to ensure wafer flatness, and total thickness variation (TTV) is controlled to minimum.






03


Edge Grinding

After slicing process, edge grinding technology is used to create rounded edges on each wafer. The purpose of this step is to minimize edge chipping, breakage and thermal induced slip in the subsequent customer's thermal processes. For different Epi thickness and/or processes, an optimized edge profile and length can be precisely processed to fulfill customer's specifications.






04


Lapping

Lapping is the process to remove residual slicing damages on the wafer surface. Initial refinement on wafer flatness is also finished during this process.






05


Etching

Both acid and caustic etching are available for various customer's requirements. The damaged layers caused by the previous processes are removed during etching process. We can also provide a residual damage layer during the caustic etching process for backside gettering purposes. Special shape control can be achieved with state-of-the-art etching machines and techniques.






06


Backside Treatment

To satisfy customer's detailed requirements, Wafer Works is capable of adding LTO, poly-back, or backside damage (BSD) to the backside of wafers. These treatments help to ensure high device yield. For thick poly-back, Wafer Works has developed a unique patented process to ensure wafer flatness.






07


Polishing

Polishing techniques have a tremendous impact on the outcome of the wafer surface. Sophisticated polishing process has been used to produce world-class silicon wafers in Wafer Works.






08


Cleaning

The cleaning process removes surface metals and micro particles  from wafer surface. An effective final cleaning process has been developed in Wafer Works to ensure the clean lines of output wafer products.






09


						Epitaxy

Epitaxy is a CVD (Chemical Vapor Deposition) proces, a single layer (or multiple layers) of mono-crystalline Si is grown on the surface of a single crystal substrate. Since the characteristics of the epitaxial surface are superior to those of the polished Si substrate, it is more suitable for dence process. Our Epitaxial process utilizes state-of-the-art equipment with cutting-edge technologies.






10


Visual Inspection

In order to supply defect-free products to our customers, we have conducted visual inspection on each wafer in the dark room with the assistance of the auxiliary light sources.






11


Wafer Characterization

After the wafer has undergone polishing and cleaning processes, advanced equipment and cutting-edge technology are used to accurately measure the wafer's resistivity, thickness, TTV, STIR, bow and warp, etc. to fulfill customer's requirements.








12


Wafer Clearance Inspection

To ensure high quality wafers will be delivered to customers, state-of-the-art surface inspection equipments are used to accurately measure particle count on the wafer surface for final screening before packaging.










13


Package

The wafers are desiccated with a nitrogen purge to evacuate humidity down lower <10%, tape sealed, double bagged (PE + Aluminum Bag), and then vacuum packed in a class 10 clean room environment.






	 








    	Copyright© Wafer Works Corporation 2012. All Rights Reserved.
        Term of Use















  wafer works corp|討論wafer works corp推薦wafer 製程與wafer(共52筆1|1頁)-愛順發分享文






 




























 







 




開箱文

產品資訊投影設備家電產品隨身精品電視投影3C 評測生活&家電行動週邊娛樂&視聽穿戴裝置科技新聞趨勢資訊安全APPiPad & iPhoneAndroid軟體安全與隱私系統工具檔案工具網路相關實用網站推薦生活應用精選技巧Word技巧軟體資訊限時免費LINEWeChatFaceBook科技新聞生活家電行動電話周邊產品平板筆電電腦時尚生活好好吃好好玩流行指標好藝文生活觀點財經投資好有趣親子生活產業新聞蘋果新聞軟體更新iPhone 新聞iPad 新聞教學分享軟體操作iOS 7觀念知識Jailbreak車車相關車車相關篇卡打車生活行車紀錄器吃喝玩樂&教學電腦應用與其他教學未分類文章吃喝玩樂KUSO3C產品評測3C新品搶先報產品評測好用AppiPhone&iPad相關Android相關資訊跨平台AppLINE 

Pokemon GO
商品分類

儲存裝置

記憶卡
隨身碟
外接硬碟
讀卡機


桌上型電腦

品牌電腦
電競系列


電腦螢幕

電腦螢幕
護目鏡/配件


列印掃描

列印機/事務機/標籤機
掃描器


處理器

全系列CPU
Intel第六代天湖CPU


主機板

主機板MB
Intel100系列主機板


記憶體

全系列RAM
超高速DDR4


平板電腦

平板電腦
保護類周邊
平板配件
保護貼


介面卡

音效卡
擴充卡


硬碟&SSD

一般硬碟
高速SSD


手機

智慧手機
一般手機


相機&攝影

相機
攝影機


行車導航

行車紀錄/胎壓偵測
GPS導航


光碟機

燒錄機/藍光機 


穿戴裝置

智慧手錶/運動手環


線材&接頭

通用線材類
電腦線材類
電腦轉接頭
網路線
USB電源
理線器材


筆記型電腦

筆電
筆電包
筆電配件


機殼&散熱風扇

機殼
CPU風扇
散熱風扇


電源供應&組裝線材

電源供應器
DIY線材
其他零件


顯示卡

遊戲顯卡
繪圖卡
GTX 970


耳機&喇叭

藍牙/耳機
喇叭
隨身喇叭


電視遊樂器

遊戲主機
遊戲軟體
周邊


電源周邊

一般電池/充電電池
排插/延長線
變壓器
UPS不斷電


電競專區

電競鍵盤
電競滑鼠
電競耳機
電競其他


鍵盤&滑鼠

鍵盤
滑鼠
簡報器
滑鼠墊
鍵盤滑鼠配件


軟體&書籍

Windows/Office
微軟ESD下載版
電腦遊戲
防毒/軟體
書籍


行動電源&手機配件

行動電源
保護類周邊
保護貼
電池充電類
其他周邊


相機配件

電池充電類
鏡頭相關類
專業配件
腳架/底片
相機包


網路裝置

無線網路分享器
網路卡
網路儲存伺服器NAS
網路攝影機
網路集線器


外接擴充

硬碟外接盒
硬碟抽取盒
USB集線器
資料切換KVM
訊號分享器




品牌館
福利品
DIY組裝電腦
估價單
特販組合包

 
























 









【令人上癮的體驗】超美App記帳城市 顛覆你對記帳的感官與習慣






強震及時警報APP~「KNY台灣天氣APP」






手機遊戲經典動作代表 《無盡之劍 II》限時免費下載中






官方Youtube GO測試版已經於部分國家Google Play上架！可讓你下載影片至手機或SD記






Artpip提供免費藝術名畫桌布，並內建自動更換功能的軟體工具！WIndows與macOS皆有












愛順發分享文



wafer works corp網站相關資料








wafer works corp網站相關資料


















首款採用澎湃S1處理器手機 小米5C發表亮相


生活好點子


/2月 28, 2017
/David


Wafer Works Corporation 小米旗下首款八核心處理器澎湃 S1，在今天下午於北京國際會議中心發表亮相，隨後首款搭載小米澎湃 S1 的智慧型手機小米 5C，也如先前曝光的資訊一樣，接續亮相。這款首款搭載澎湃 S1 處理器的小米 5C，定位在中高階等級，搭配不錯的外形設計與軟硬體規格，也許能替澎湃 S1 打出不錯的一役。 小米 After nearly 20 years of hard work, Wafer Works has become the seventh largest silicon wafer manufacturer ......









小米旗下首款處理器亮相 澎湃S1於北京正式發表


生活好點子


/2月 28, 2017
/David


合晶光電股份有限公司 對於智慧型手機品牌來說，如果能裡裡外外、每個元件都自己包辦，那對於降低手機的造機成本來說可說是一大優勢。因此，市場上也有不少品牌開始開發專用的處理器，像是蘋果、三星、華為、聯發科等。而一直很有創新與突破精神的小米，也在今天加入這個行列，透過旗下在 2014 成立的松果電子品牌，於北京國家會議中心發賀：本公司參加勞委會推行... | 2012-10-31 本公司參與100年度工安... | 2011-12-05 本公司積極落實職場無 ......









Sony Xperia XZ Premium 有多美？ 讓我們近距離來看看


3C 評測


/2月 28, 2017
/好手


Wafer Works Corporation - Investor Relations - Press CenterSony 昨天發表了今年旗艦新機 Sony Xperia XZ Premium，不只在相機功能有突破性的進步，在外觀上也和 Sony Xperia XZ 所使用的 AKALEIDO 材質不同，改用玻璃材質的背蓋讓，呈現與上一代完全不同的質感。好手在 MWC 現場向 Sony 借來一隻真機，和大家分享Wafer Works Corp. approved financial statements and private placement at the 2015 Annual ......









三星 Galaxy S7 edge 獲選為 2016 年最佳智慧手機


科技


/2月 28, 2017
/好手


Wafer Works Optronics Corp. - 合晶光電股份有限公司每一年 GSMA 都會在 MWC 期間發表年度的 Glomo 大獎，在智慧型手機領域，三星 Galaxy S7 edge 獲 GSMA 評選為 2016 年度最佳智慧手機。雖然去年的 Note 7 事件讓三星受到重創，也連帶影響到今年 Galaxy  S8 的上市發佈時間 (上市時間已發布)，但仍然股票代號：5221 合晶光電股份股份有限公司 Wafer Works Optronics Corp. 中華民國九十九年度年報 ANNUAL ......









蝦咪！這支雙卡雙待 有指紋辨識的金屬機身國民手機竟然只要約台幣 3 126 元？小米科技推出「紅米 


產品資訊


/2月 28, 2017
/林小旭


Wafer tumbler lock - Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia 摔機不如買新機？好像是這樣齁！小米科技推出「紅米 4X」國民手機，與台灣目前正在銷售中的「紅米 Note 4X」相比之下規格是比較低的配置，但卻仍擁有 5 吋螢幕、4,100mAh 的大電池容量以及金屬機身，也算是很有誠意的產品，在大陸標準定價只要 699 人民幣(2GB/16GB) 以及 899A wafer tumbler lock is a type of lock that uses a set of flat wafers to prevent the lock from ......









[ MWC 2017 ]小米發表自製處理器，由松果電子操刀的澎湃 S1 將確定搭載在小米 5c 手機


通訊達人


/2月 28, 2017
/Amola


Wafer Fab Operator Jobs, Employment | Indeed.com 在 Apple 推出 A10 Fusion、三星（Samsung）推出 Exynos 9、Huawei 推出 Kirin 960 處理器後，小米也正式成為自製處理器的手機品牌之一。小米在 2 月 28 日正式推出的自製處理器「澎湃 S1（Surge S1）」，將首先搭載於小米 5C 這款手機上！ 52 Wafer Fab Operator Jobs available on Indeed.com. one search. all jobs. ... Wafer Fab Test Operato ......









[ MWC 2017 ] 不死神機 NOKIA 3310 復刻版簡易上手玩，其實不太一樣吧！


3C產品評測


/2月 28, 2017
/每日C


SPIE | Journal of Micro/Nanolithography, MEMS, and MOEMS | Characterization of wafer geometry and ov 亙古流芳的不死神機 NOKIA 3310 今次在 MWC 2017 發表了全新復刻版本，但大家都知道如果老歌翻唱會比新歌翻紅更具難度，到底復刻 NOKIA 3310 能不能成功越過自己築起的高牆，看完接下來的簡易上手玩後，留待讀者心中自己評價。 在進入本文之前，先讓我們懷念回味一下 NOKIA 3... thickness variation—used in this study was measured using a recently developed product wafer ge ......









[ MWC 2017 ]Sony Xperia XZ Premium XZs 新機簡易動手玩


3C產品評測


/2月 28, 2017
/每日C


Industrial Products | Spectroline 就在 2 月 27 日 Sony 發表了四款新手機，下午終於爭取到珍貴的 20 分鐘近距離欣賞時間，這次就讓我們來個快速動手玩玩兩款旗艦新機 Xperia XZ Premium 與 XZs！ Sony 每回發表的新機總是撓得人心癢癢，這次兩款旗艦級新機 Xperia XZ Premium 與 XZ... — Tom Pike, Western Farmers Electric Cooperative (WFEC) “The yellow dye in OIL-GLO 22 works gre ......









APK Downloader - 不用透過網頁，用 APP 直接將 APK 下載在手機裡更快速


Android 相關


/3月 1, 2017
/yimeng1216


Feldman Engineering Corp.阿湯之前介紹過三款 APK 下載工具，一款是 Google Chrome 的擴充套件，但要登入帳號較麻煩，另兩款則要經由網頁來下載，今天阿湯要介紹的是 Android 系統專用的 APP「APK Downloader」，可以將想要保存的 APK 直接下載在手機裡，不用經由電腦或其他網頁，畢竟下載來的Feldman Engineering Corp. helps transform technology from concept to successful products and ......









Film Emulator - 線上編輯相片免上傳，一秒製作專屬的菲林底片效果


線上工具&服務


/3月 1, 2017
/阿湯


Spectroline現在大部分人都用數位相機，但還是不少人懷念早期底片機細膩的風格，想要這種菲林相片的特殊效果，除了在拍攝的時候選擇相機內建的濾鏡，或是透過影像軟體後製來取得，也可以使用「Film Emulator」這個免費的線上工具，只要開啟網頁選擇電腦裡的相片，不用上傳就能進行編輯，有數十種底片特效可以套用，還可以... making it ideal for all industrial fluid system leak applications. The flashlight works with al ......



其他相關網站推薦








Wafer Works Corporation


8月 1, 2017


After nearly 20 years of hard work, Wafer Works has become the seventh largest silicon wafer manufacturer ......









合晶光電股份有限公司


7月 29, 2017


賀：本公司參加勞委會推行... | 2012-10-31 本公司參與100年度工安... | 2011-12-05 本公司積極落實職場無 ......









Wafer Works Corporation - Investor Relations - Press Center


8月 1, 2017


Wafer Works Corp. approved financial statements and private placement at the 2015 Annual ......









Wafer Works Optronics Corp. - 合晶光電股份有限公司


7月 27, 2017


股票代號：5221 合晶光電股份股份有限公司 Wafer Works Optronics Corp. 中華民國九十九年度年報 ANNUAL ......









Wafer tumbler lock - Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


8月 1, 2017


A wafer tumbler lock is a type of lock that uses a set of flat wafers to prevent the lock from ......









Wafer Fab Operator Jobs, Employment | Indeed.com


7月 27, 2017


52 Wafer Fab Operator Jobs available on Indeed.com. one search. all jobs. ... Wafer Fab Test Operato ......









SPIE | Journal of Micro/Nanolithography, MEMS, and MOEMS | Characterization of wafer geometry and ov


7月 28, 2017


... thickness variation—used in this study was measured using a recently developed product wafer ge ......









Industrial Products | Spectroline


8月 3, 2017


... — Tom Pike, Western Farmers Electric Cooperative (WFEC) “The yellow dye in OIL-GLO 22 works gre ......









Feldman Engineering Corp.


7月 28, 2017


Feldman Engineering Corp. helps transform technology from concept to successful products and ......









Spectroline


7月 31, 2017


... making it ideal for all industrial fluid system leak applications. The flashlight works with al ......











最新文章












Softorino Youtube Converter 線上影片與 MP3 下載 轉檔 傳輸到 iO


吃喝玩樂&教學


/8月 3, 2017
/Rocky













Ten Years Ago 讓你一探究竟 Youtube Apple 等世界知名網站不堪回首的十年前


吃喝玩樂&教學


/8月 3, 2017
/Rocky













親愛的我把充電器變薄了 KADO 世上最薄旅充募資當中


生活好點子


/8月 3, 2017
/David













《植劇場》正式加入 Netflix，登上全球舞台！


網路大小事


/8月 3, 2017
/Amanda













Windows 10 預覽版正在測試 眼球追蹤 ，並試著為命令提示字元介面改顏色


3C產品評測


/8月 3, 2017
/Amola













愛奇藝推線上影院 「熱門院線電影」隨買即看！


生活好點子


/8月 3, 2017
/Candice













手機整夜充電會讓電池短命？ iFixit 負責人說：沒這回事


3C產品評測


/8月 3, 2017
/每日C













對不起 攝影師，因為我帶了 HTC U11 拍照實在太漂亮


3C 評測


/8月 3, 2017
/Werboy













Google Pixel 2 XL 保護殼預購 高屏佔比螢幕間接曝光


生活好點子


/8月 3, 2017
/David













ASUS ZenScreen MB16AC 開箱 體驗 外出工作神器！不閃屏 抗藍光一條傳輸線全部搞


3C產品評測


/8月 3, 2017
/電腦王阿達














網友正在看











【MWC 2017】LG發出邀請函，將發表 LG G6 新旗艦機


科技


/2月 7, 2017














Google Maps更新 下方加入即時路況與附近景點資訊


生活好點子


/2月 7, 2017














Lenovo推出三款ThinkPad P工作站筆電


生活好點子


/2月 7, 2017














大螢幕完美比例 LG G6邀請函曝光


生活好點子


/2月 7, 2017













精選文章













































































































熱門搜尋

wafer workswafer 製程wafer 晶圓waferlockdummy wafer 供應silicon wafer 製程bgbm waferwafer check valvewafer是什麼wafer cassettewafer connectorchip半導體diewafer sortwafer bonding 


Facebook粉絲團關注



順發3C量販


 





 
























 

 








Wafer Works Corp. (合晶科技) Company Profile | EMIS










 


















Close



Menu







Search




$0.00 (0)
Basket



Basket


 

 




 
 



Total


USD
$0.00


 

View basket
Checkout now
 

 






Industry Reports
Company Reports
M&A Reports



                                 
                            













 


 
 


















Home  Company reports search  Wafer Works Corp. (合晶科技)     







 


 Taiwan                
Wafer Works Corp. (合晶科技)
An EMIS Company Report
EMIS is a Euromoney Institutional Investor plc company
USD 29.95

Industry: Semiconductor and Other Electronic Component Manufacturing 
Available in: English & Chinese
Format: PDF Download
Most recent financial data: 2016

Buy full report
 
 
 
 




What’s included?
This report extracts all available information about this company from EMIS' database of company information. The Table of Contents on the right indicates the categories of information that will be included in your report upon purchase.
Download a sample report






 


Company Tear Sheet                    
                        (locked content will be provided in the purchased report)
                    


Contact Information                    





Headquarters
                                No.100, Longyuan 1st Rd., Longtan Science Park, Taoyuan, Taiwan                                
                                Taoyuan County;                                Taoyuan County;                                Map 


Tel: 886-3-481
Fax: 886-3-481




Website:
http://www.waferworks.com 



 

Company Description                    




                         Wafer Works is a world-class electronic material supplier and specializing in heavily doped silicon wafers manufacturing. With years of researching and developing in LED and solar energy applications, Wafer Works is able to provide its customers with high quality sapphire substrates and solar wafers. Operating under a vertically integrated manufacturing process, Wafer Works offers a broad range of business solutions for customers through a vertically integrated product-line. We are committed to staying one-step ahead of the curve, creating new options and solutions for our global customers. Wafer Works Corporation was the first company in Taiwan to successfully manufacture a heavily doped 8-inch monocrystalline ingot through crystal growth. As an innovative industry leader in manufacturing and development we are always striving to meet future technology trends. Wafer Works is committed to being the world leader in green manufacturing. We have incorporated environmental safety conduct into every step of our manufacturing process. And while we are proud of our energy reduction achievements, we strive to accomplish more. In the fast-pace high-tech, dynamic global market, where environmental issues are becoming a greater concern and energy prices continue to soar; the demand for more energy-efficient consumer electronic goods and alternative energy sources continues to grow. To address the market demands for smaller and more energy-efficient consumer electronics and to help protect and preserve the environment, Wafer Works has been investing heavily in alternative energy-efficient resources, such as solar energy and LED technology. To better reach and serve our global clients, Wafer Works has set up over ten locations around the world, three advanced manufacturing facilities across Taiwan and China, and additional sales and service centers in each key market region around the world. Wafer Works vows to keep its world-class technology on the cutting-edge and is focused on developing new products to meet our customers’ needs. We strive to develop successful win-win relationships with all our customers. We measure our success, based on your success.                    


NAICS Industry Classification                    


Basic Information                    


Key Executives                    


Ownership Details                    


Key Financial Highlights                    


Financial Performance Charts                    


Top Competitors                    

 

Financial Statements

Annual Statements                    


Ratios                    

 

EMIS Credit Analytics

EMIS Benchmark Score                    

 







 
 





What this report allows you to do
EMIS company reports provide the data you need to make accurate assessments about businesses you are interested in.




Identify sales opportunities

Does the company match your target demographic?
Who are the key executives?




Conduct risk assessment

Is the company creditworthy?
Is it financially stable?




Carry out strategic research

Is the company a potential business partner/investment opportunity?
What is its financial performance?


 
 
 
 


You’re in good company
EMIS company reports are used extensively by the world’s biggest companies, financial institutions, professional service companies and universities to assess businesses in emerging markets. 







800,000+
company profiles
We have information on both public and private companies across 125 countries.


2,000+
clients
EMIS is the go-to information source on emerging market companies for the world’s most prestigious businesses.

 
 
 
 

 









Enterprise ACCESS
If you need regular and ongoing access to company information, you should consider a subscription to the full EMIS service.
EMIS company profiles are part of a larger information service where that combines company, industry and country data and analysis for over 125 emerging markets on a unique information platform.
REQUEST A DEMO




 


Contact us to learn more about our business solutions.
 
 





FOLLOW US

B



 
 



Sign up to our newsletter
Make sure you’re not the last to know by getting the latest insights on emerging markets straight to your inbox.


Sign up

 
 


 
 
 















 

     6182.TW Company Profile & Executives - Wafer Works Corp. - Wall Street Journal                                     DOW JONES, A NEWS CORP COMPANY         News Corp is a network of leading companies in the worlds of diversified media, news, education, and information services.  DOW JONES  Barron's BigCharts DJX Dow Jones Newswires Factiva Financial News Mansion Global MarketWatch   Newsmart NewsPlus Private Markets Risk & Compliance WSJ.com WSJ Pro WSJ Conference WSJ Video    NEWS CORP  Big Decisions Business Spectator Checkout51 Harper Collins New York Post PropTiger REA   realtor.com Storyful The Australian The Sun The Times              DJIA ▲  22027.95 0.05%        S&P 500 ▲  2472.13 -0.22%        Nasdaq ▲  6348.79 -0.22%        U.S. 10 Yr ▲  9/32 yield 2.24%        Crude Oil ▲  49.25 -0.69%        Euro ▲  1.187 0.11%                 Subscribe Now Sign In      The Wall Street Journal     Asia Edition  U.S. Asia Europe India 中国 (China) 日本 (Japan)    3 August 2017   Today's Paper     Sections    My Journal       Home   World   U.S.   Politics   Economy   Business   Tech   Markets   Opinion   Arts   Life   Real Estate   Today's Paper   SHOW ALL SECTIONS HIDE ALL SECTIONS     World Home   Africa Asia Canada China Europe Latin America Middle East   Economy   World Video     U.S. Home   Economy Law New York Politics   Real Time Economics Washington Wire   Journal Report U.S. Video What's News Podcast     Politics Home   Washington Wire   Politics Video WSJ/NBC News Poll     Economy Home   Real Time Economics   Economic Forecasting Survey Economy Video     Business Home   Management Tech/WSJ.D   Aerospace & Defense Autos & Transportation Commercial Real Estate Consumer Products Energy Entrepreneurship Financial Services Food & Services Health Care Hospitality Law Manufacturing Media & Marketing Natural Resources Retail   CFO Journal CIO Journal CMO Today Logistics Report Risk & Compliance   Heard on the Street   Business Video Journal Report Business Podcast     Tech Home   CIO Journal   Geoffrey Fowler Christopher Mims Joanna Stern Li Yuan   Billion Dollar Startup Club Tech Video Tech Podcast Startup Stock Trader     Markets Home   Bonds Commercial Real Estate Commodities & Futures Currencies Deals Financial Services Funds Stocks Your Money   Heard on the Street MoneyBeat Wealth Adviser Ahead of the Tape   CFO Journal Journal Report Market Data Markets Video Markets Podcast MoneyBeat Podcast Watching Your Wealth Podcast     Opinion Home   James Freeman William A. Galston Daniel Henninger Holman W. Jenkins William McGurn Peggy Noonan Mary Anastasia O'Grady Jason Riley Kimberley A. Strassel   Books Film Television Theater Art Masterpiece Series Music Dance Opera Exhibition Cultural Commentary   Editorials Commentary Letters to the Editor The Weekend Interview Potomac Watch Podcast Foreign Edition Podcast Opinion Video Notable & Quotable Best of the Web Newsletter Morning Editorial Report Newsletter     Arts Home   Books Film Television Theater Art Masterpiece Series   Arts Video WSJ. Magazine     Life Home   Careers Cars Food & Drink Health Ideas Real Estate Science Sports Style & Fashion Travel   Life Video WSJ. Magazine WSJ Puzzles The Future of Everything     Real Estate Home   Commercial Real Estate House of the Day Mansion   Real Estate Video      HIDE ALL SECTIONS      Aim higher, reach further.  Get the Wall Street Journal $12 for 12 weeks. Subscribe Now   Sign In   Reveal Navigation Options    Subscribe Sign In              Wafer Works Corp. 6182 (TPEx)      search    View All companies            N/A CST N/A     NT$0.00 TWD     0.00 0.00%     Volume 0       Volume 0     65 Day Avg Vol      1 Day Range 0.00 - 0.00     52 Week Range            1 D 5 D 1 M 3 M YTD 1 Y 3 Y    $ %            Advanced Charting Compare     Compare to Benchmark:   DJIA   S&P 500   GLOBAL DOW   NASDAQ   Technology      Compare to    Add          Open  0.00   Prior Close  0.00 (N/A)     1 Day    6182 0.00%     DJIA 0.05%     S&P 500 -0.22%     Technology 0.48%                             Overview Profile Key People     Overview Profile Financials Income Statement Balance Sheet Cash Flow Research & Ratings Historical Prices Options Advanced Charting              Ping-Hai Patrick Chiao, 66 Chairman, Wafer Works Corp. Mr. Ping-Hai P. Chiao is Chairman at Wafer Works Optronics Corp., Chairman & General Manager at Wafer Works Corp., President at Helitek Co. Ltd., Chairman at Silicon Technology Investment (Cayman) Corp., and Chairman at Heli-Vantech Corp. Mr. Chiao was previously employed as Non-Executive Director by Solargiga Energy Holdings Ltd., a Manager by Lite-On Semiconductor Corp., a Manager-Process Engineering by Siltec Corp., and a Manager-Product Research & Development by Eg & G Reticon Corp. He also served on the board at ACME Electronics Corp. He received his undergraduate degree from Chung Yuan Christian University and a graduate degree from San Jose State University.          News Wafer Works Corp.6182  No news for 6182 in the past two years.           All Company Executives Wafer Works Corp.       Ping Hai Patrick Chiao, 66 Chairman     Chun Lin Chen General Manager     Jui Yuan Mao, 46 Head-Finance & Accounting     Te Chang Yeh Member-Supervisory Board     Tai Yuan Wang Member-Supervisory Board     Chin Jung Lin Director     Chen Tu Liu Director     Chung Ho Tai, 67 Director     Ming Hsiang Lin Director     Yung Sung Tsai Independent Director     Tung Hsing Wu Independent Director      expand          Advertisement                 Notes & Data Providers   Real-time U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. International stock quotes are delayed as per exchange requirements. Indexes may be real-time or delayed; refer to time stamps on index quote pages for information on delay times. Quote data, except U.S. stocks, provided by SIX Financial Information. Data is provided "as is" for informational purposes only and is not intended for trading purposes. SIX Financial Information (a) does not make any express or implied warranties of any kind regarding the data, including, without limitation, any warranty of merchantability or fitness for a particular purpose or use; and (b) shall not be liable for any errors, incompleteness, interruption or delay, action taken in reliance on any data, or for any damages resulting therefrom. Data may be intentionally delayed pursuant to supplier requirements.  All of the mutual fund and ETF information contained in this display was supplied by Lipper, A Thomson Reuters Company, subject to the following: Copyright  © Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Any copying, republication or redistribution of Lipper content, including by caching, framing or similar means, is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Lipper. Lipper shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon. Bond quotes are updated in real-time. Source: Tullett Prebon. Currency quotes are updated in real-time. Source: Tullet Prebon. Fundamental company data and analyst estimates provided by FactSet. Copyright  FactSet Research Systems Inc. All rights reserved.        Advertisement                 




























Wafer Works(Shanghai) Corp., Mp 500 Gui Nan Rd Songjiang Shang Shanghai China | Supplier Report — Panjiva





 













磐聚网

菜单 





磐聚网


解决方案

采购商
供应商
物流公司
政府机关
数据分析



产品

台
企业版
定制服务



数据

美国贸易数据
墨西哥贸易数据
巴西贸易数据
中 & 南美洲数据
中国贸易数据
趋势分析工具
磐聚网调研


价格详情
搜索

中文


English 

Español 







 在线演示 申请在线演示 

+86-21-6196-2555


登录 











Wafer Works(Shanghai) Corp.
磐聚网制作的企业页面 
 企业页面  供应商公司  中国







 查看 Wafer Works(Shanghai) Corp.公司的产品和客户 
成千上万家像您这样的公司使用磐聚网搜索供应商和竞争对手。


Request a Demo

        1 min video
      






轻松使用贸易数据


17美国进口货运
中国贸易数据

 

以公司为组织的美国海关记录
17适用于美国的出货量Wafer Works(Shanghai) Corp.自2007年起每周更新一次




日期
供应商
客户
详细信息

          41          more fields
        


2010-08-08

查看全部 17 货运记录 Wafer Works(Shanghai) Corp. 选择磐聚网数据套餐方案.申请演示或注册
 

2010-07-18


2009-09-11
Wafer Works(Shanghai) Corp.
Francis International Trading(Canad
Polished Wafer
货运提单


货运数据显示一个公司交易什么产品或者更多。
      了解更多信息 



 查看中国贸易数据 Wafer Works(Shanghai) Corp.

完全覆盖141 HTS编码。中国贸易数据是另一个与美国进口数据分开的数据源。它包括HTS产品代码及他们的美元价值。 什么是HTS编码？ 




货运信息
总价值
HTS
货物描述


542

See detailed information about all 141 HTS codes for Wafer Works(Shanghai) Corp. with Panjiva's Chinese Trade Data add-on.Request a DemoorSign Up
 

304


115
$3,074,581
3824.90
Other:


中国贸易数据包括产品代码，价值, 及货运方式了解更多




快速地分析贸易关系




采购业务链
探索隐藏在美国进口数据的贸易关系。
See all 2 的客户 Wafer Works(Shanghai) Corp.
 详细了解采购业务链 




最大的客户


Francis International Tradi... 






注册并访问 






 2 可联系的客户 


顶级产品


晶圆 





polished 





polished wafer 





man cotton jacket 





棉夹克 





 8出口最多的产品 






联系信息Wafer Works(Shanghai) Corp.



 
 地址Mp 500 Gui Nan Rd Songjiang Shang Shanghai China 
 



注册并访问 


 




           


    


Sample Bill of Lading

17 shipment records available



Date
2010-08-08


Shipper Name
Wafer Works(Shanghai) Corp.


Shipper Address
MP.500 GUI NAN ROAD SONGJIANG SHANG, SHANGHAI, CHINA


Consignee Name
Francis International Trading(Canad


Consignee Address
1605 CHABANEL WEST SUITE 300, MONTREAL QC, CANADA


Weight
100


Weight Unit
KG


Weight in KG
100.0


Quantity
1


Quantity Unit
CTN


Country of Origin
China


Details
100.0 kgFrom port: Shanghai, ChinaTo port: Port of Tacoma, Tacoma, Washington


Place of Receipt
Shanghai,  China


Foreign Port of Lading
Shanghai, China


U.S. Port of Unlading
Port of Tacoma, Tacoma, Washington


U.S. Destination Port
Port of Tacoma, Tacoma, Washington


Commodity
Polished Wafer


Container
FCIU8326375


Carrier Name
T H I GROUP LTD


Vessel Name
GUANG DONG BRIDGE


Voyage Number
29E


Bill of Lading Number
THIWSHA10072070


Master Bill of Lading Number
YMLUW230440418


Lloyd's Code
9302102


HTS Codes
HTS 8425







 


同类产品的供应商China 

Chinese cotton manufacturers
Chinese cotton jacket manufacturers
Chinese jacket manufacturers
Chinese polished manufacturers
Chinese polished wafer manufacturers
Chinese wafer manufacturers.
            


供应商类似Wafer Works(Shanghai) Corp. 

Shanghai Nutech Fastener Co., Ltd.
Jiande Tongda Imp. & Exp.
Juki Corporation
Shantou Kangshenglong Industrial
Jiangsu Osmen Investment Casting
Great Compass Group International L.
              






成千上万的公司使用磐聚网研究供应商和竞争对手

申请在线演示











解决方案
采购商
供应商
物流公司
政府机关
数据分析




产品
台
企业版
定制服务




数据
美国
墨西哥
巴西
中、南美州
中国
磐聚网调研
合作伙伴




公司名
领导团队
董事会
博客
媒体评论
联系方式
职位



                20 West 22nd Street, Suite 706New York, NY, 10010 / USA上海市徐汇区肇嘉浜路1065号1609D单元                ‌
Request a demo











English 

Español 

中文







使用条款
隐私条款
网站地图





2017年©Panjiva公司







Cart (0) 
Continue Browsing

 






 










Wafer Works Corp. - Relationship Science
































































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              





























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





Wafer Works Corp.



Overview
Executives & Employees Board of Directors Paths
Financials Investments Suppliers



Wafer Works Corp.



 OVERVIEW



Date Founded


1997




Headquarters


No. 100 Longyuan 1st Road, Longtan Science Park, Longtan District, Taoyuan 325 42




Type of Company



                                                                    Public
                                                            




Employees (Worldwide)


808




Industries


Semiconductors




Company Description


Wafer Works is a world-class electronic material supplier and specializing in heavily doped silicon wafers manufacturing. Wafer Works is able to provide its customers with high quality sapphire substrates and solar wafers. Operating under a vertically integrated manufacturing process, Wafer Works offers a broad range of business solutions for customers through a vertically integrated product-line.




Website


http://www.waferworks.com





 Executives & Employees



Ping Hai Patrick Chiao

Chairman




Jui Yuan Mao

Head-Finance & Accounting







See our list of current and previous employees when you upgrade.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 



                          Board of Directors                        



Ping Hai Patrick Chiao

Chairman at Wafer Works Corp.




Kenneth Tai

Co-Founder at InveStar Capital, Inc.





Ming Hsiang Lin

Head-Finance, Director & Deputy General Manager at Hua Eng Wire & Cable Co., Ltd.




Chen Tu Liu

Director at Asia Polymer Corp.





Tsai Yung Sung

Independent Director at Wafer Works Corp.







See our list of current and previous board members when you upgrade.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Paths to Wafer Works Corp.



                        Wafer Works Corp.                    




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 Wafer Works Corp.






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with Wafer Works Corp..

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Key Stats and Financials as of 2016



Market Capitalization


$5.95B




Total Enterprise Value


$11.3B




Earnings Per Share


$-3.55




Revenue


$5.4B




Net Profit


$-1.49B




EBITDA


$464M




EBITDAMargin


8.58%




Total Debt


$5.85B




Total Equity


$5.18B




Five Year Compounded Annual Growth Rate Of Revenue


-3.84%




Three Year Compounded Annual Growth Rate Of Revenue


-0.28%




Enterprise Value Sales


2.1x




Enterprise Value EBITDAOperating


24.43x




TEVNet Income


-7.61x




Debt TEV


0.52x






See financial details and more using RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Investments




 Details Hidden



Meridian Energy USA, Inc.

                                    Meridian Energy USA, Inc. develops utility-scale environmentally clean solar farms and other renewable energy projects. It offers renewable electricity for sale to utilities, municipalities and other customers. The company provides CalRENEW-1, the utility-scale photovoltaic solar facility under the state's Renewables Portfolio Standard (RPS) Program. The firm offers renewable electricity for sale to utilities, municipalities, and other customers. Meridian Energy USA was founded in 2007 and is headquartered in Pleasanton, CA.                                





 Suppliers



OCI Co. Ltd.

                                     •  Semiconductors                                                                             •  Seoul, SL                                                                    

                                    OCI Co., Ltd. engages in the manufacturing and sales of chemical products. It operates through the following business segments: Renewable Energy, Inorganic Chemicals, Fine Chemicals, Insulation, Sapphire Ingot, Petrochemicals and Coal. The Renewable Energy segment offers polysilicon which is the primary raw materials used in the solar PV industry. The Inorganic Chemicals segment products include soda ash, sodium percarbonate, hydrogen peroxide, calcium chloride, sodium chlorate and fumed silica which are essential to a wide range of industries. The Petrochemicals and Coal segment offers a variety of chemical products such as carbon black, toluene di-isocyanate, pitch, benzene, toluene, xylene, phthalic, anhydride, polyol and plasticizer. The Fine Chemicals segment provides an array of chemical reagents and agrochemicals. Its products include phosphoric acid, chemical reagents, nitrogen trifluoride, mono silane, tungsten hexafluoride and silicon filament. The Insulation segment offers insulation materials such as ENERVAC. It was founded on August 5, 1959 and is headquartered in Seoul, South Korea.
                                






You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.















Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤



















Wafer Works Shanghai Corp
































 












Plans




Limited




Plus




Premium








            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 3-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 3-months from the current date.




            PlusSmall & Medium Business



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 12-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 12-months from the current date.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies




            Premium            Empire Builder



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
You'll have access to our entire database of shipping manifests of U.S. Ocean freight imports going back to November 2006.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies





            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
Our Limited Plan lets you monitor the shipping activities of any three companies across all our databases. Be the first to know when your target company clears a shipment through customs in one of the countries we track.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plans, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

10 Company Searches Per Day
10 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan which allows more searches.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 1k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Company Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Usage

25 Searches Per Day
25 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Premium plan which allows more searches.
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 25 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches
If you need to track more than 5 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Usage

50 Searches Per Day
 
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 50 companies in our database each month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, contact the Sales Department to purchase more credits and export additional shipping records.
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches





             Plus             Small & Medium Business



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Premium            Empire Builder



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.
Dedicated Research Assistant
An experienced trade data specialist will serve as your dedicated account manager to locate hard-to-reach data, perform searches and compile reports on your behalf.




            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.







X












                   Home                





                        How It Works                    



                            U.S. Data                        

                            Additional Countries                        

                            Our Datasets                        

                            Our Clients                        

                            IG Reviews                        

                            Videos                        

                            Pictures                        

                            Presentation                        



                   Plans & Pricing                

                    Search                

                  Contact Us                
Live Chat				

                    Free Demo                

                    Sign In                

                    Join Now                











English
中文
French










English



中文



French



 

Get global shipment alerts for Wafer Works  Shanghai Corp, $9.95 /month

Processing, please wait ...







Cardholder's Name


Tell us your Full Name



Credit Card No. 








Enter a valid Card No.



Exp. Date

1 January
2 February
3 March
4 April
5 May
6 June
7 July
8 August
9 September
10 October
11 November
12 December




2017
2018
2019
2020
2021
2022
2023
2024
2025
2026



Postal Code / Zip


(or Postal Code if not in the USA)




  Terms of Service




Submit















			                                                Service: 855-573-9976 
                        Sales: +1-855-573-9976

 Live Chat

Choose Language
 English
 中文
 French




 



Hi, may I help you with something?

An ImportGenius.com sales agent is available to answer your question.


							Chat Live Now						

						No, thanks.					







Sign Up






Home
How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Search
Contact Us


Live Chat

2
  



 



Wafer Works  Shanghai Corp

Wafer Works(shanghai) Corp exports to Francis Enterprises Inc through the port of Tacoma, Washington        





 Call +1 (480) 744 2559




Import Genius






                                Our bill of lading data reveals the trading activities of Wafer Works  Shanghai Corp and millions of other manufacturers.                            


Learn More
Join Now




Request a Demo





Would you like to schedule a free demo?
We'd love to show you international trade data relevant to your own business.










Name




Email





Phone






Schedule A Free Demo


















Play muted


International Trade Starts With Our Data









Other companies in our database

 TRANSITYRE FRANCE S.A. MICHELIN EXP
 CVS PHARMACY INC
 GENERAL ELECTRIC CAPITAL CORPORATIO
 SHIN CATERPILLAR MITSUBISHI        
 PANASONIC CONSUMER ELECTRONICS COMP
















View Sample Shipment Records
Shipment Alert Subscription
Contact This Company



Sign Up

 





Sample shipment record for Wafer Works  Shanghai Corp
Wafer Works(shanghai) Corp exports to Francis Enterprises Inc through the port of Tacoma, Washington


                                Bill of Lading                            





Manufacturer / Shipper
Consignee



WAFER WORKS(SHANGHAI) CORP
MP.500 GUI NAN ROAD SONGJIANG SHANG
SHANGHAI                           
CHINA


FRANCIS INTERNATIONAL TRADING(CANAD
1605 CHABANEL WEST SUITE 300       
MONTREAL QC                        
CANADA



Notify Party
Marks and Numbers








NO MARKS
NO MARKS





Master Bill of Lading Number
Container Number



YMLUW230440418


FCIU8326375
FCIU8326375


Product Description




POLISHED WAFER
POLISHED WAFER









Bill of LadingTHIWSHA10072070 Arrival Date2010-08-08Weight (LB)220Weight (KG)100Quantity1 CTNContainer Count1Voyage No.29EPort of LoadingSHANGHAIPort of DischargeTACOMA, WASHINGTONVessel NameGUANG DONG BRIDGECarrier CodeTHIWCountry Of OriginChinaPlace Of ReceiptSHANGHAI,  CHINA 





Subscribe to access the complete shipping history for Wafer Works  Shanghai Corp. Join Now 







How will your business use our trade data?
If you're involved in international trade, our database of shipping manifests will help you find opportunities to grow your business.

Find Trading Partners You Can Trust
Monitor Competitors' Shipping Activities
Connect With Sales Prospects














                            "Very informative and great site and so quick. Pretty slick."
                        







Betty Fatzie

                                                                    President,                                 
                                                                    Lab Products, Inc.                                
                            






                            "The service was great, with a reasonable price and great results. We have now started using another supplier from China. We just ordered our first container from the new supplier and with the savings it more than paid for the ImportGenius.com service on the first container load."
                        







Cleve Kurz

                                
                                                                    Gifford Monument Works                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is not merely an investment for our organization, it’s a vital instrument to effectively manage our time. It has afforded us the ability to quickly segment, target and position ourselves in front of prospective clients. Thank you, Import Genius!"
                        







David Bryant

                                                                    Director of Business Development,                                 
                                                                    John S. James Co.                                
                            






                            "Import Genius data is fantastic for evaluating component manufacturers in China."
                        







Sanjay Dastoor

                                
                                                                    BoostedBoards.com                                
                            






                            "We have confidence that we're working with the best manufacturers in part because Import Genius showed us that they already supply some of the world's top brands"
                        







Yaniv Masjedi

                                                                    Vice President,                                 
                                                                    Nextiva.com                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is a highly informative tool for monitoring public companies' operating activities. It is an invaluable part of our research."
                        







Eric DeLamarter

                                                                    Managing Partner,                                 
                                                                    Half Moon Capital                                
                            






                            "We find new clients for our customs brokerage in the ImportGenius database almost every day"
                        







Jayson Gispan

                                                                    Customs Brokerage Operations Manager,                                 
                                                                    Flexport.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius is a great research tool. We use it to evaluate manufacturers to make sure we are working with only the highest quality, most reliable suppliers"
                        







Chris Friedland

                                                                    Founder / CEO,                                 
                                                                    Build.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius gave us visibility into the actual shipping histories of the manufacturers we were evaluating and helped us feel comfortable we were working with the best suppliers in China."
                        







Morena Simitic

                                                                    COO,                                 
                                                                    BellaBeat.com                                
                            
























Shipment Alert Subscription



                        Get e-mail alerts when Wafer Works  Shanghai Corp has new shipments.                        

Processing, please wait ...









Submit












Contact Wafer Works  Shanghai Corp







 



Name



Business



Email



Phone




Submit




Processing, please wait ...

 

 





Features



Save and Share Reports
Easily get your searches out of Import Genius and into your team’s hands for further analysis. Export your findings to XLS or CSV, or send reports via email. It’s the simple things that make our trade data even more valuable to you.



See the Supply Chain
Visual Mapping shows you exactly how your target companies and their trading partners connect. Search by shipper and see everyone they’ve shipped to. Or search by consignee and see all their suppliers. Zoom in on any company to see their own trading network. Dive deep into international trade and discover the links in anyone’s supply chain.



Get Real-time Shipment Alerts
Stay on top of your competitors, suppliers, and customers with real-time alerts. Just set up a search and get an email whenever a new shipment matches your terms. Import Genius lets you know the moment they bring in a rival product or start shipping to a new partner.








Wafer Works  Shanghai Corp
You've viewed 20 profile pages on Import Genius, which is the most we allow for free. Sign up for ImportGenius to get more details on over 3 million importers and exporters. It only takes seconds.






Sign Up for Import Genius! 








Plans




Limited
Monitor Your Competitors




Recommended Plan
Plus
Small & Medium Business




Premium
Empire Builder






Price





$
99
594
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
199
1,194
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
399
2,394
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    







Data




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details






Usage





Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches

View Details





25 Searches Per Day
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches

View Details





50 Searches Per Day
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches

View Details






Features


 


Visual Mapping
View Details




Visual Mapping
View Details






Support




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details





Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Dedicated Research Assistant

View Details






  






View All U.S. Imports
Instantly search 109,970,574 ocean freight records to monitor U.S. importers, research suppliers, generate sales leads and more.


As Featured In





















What is Import Genius





Who Uses Import Genius





Available Data Fields







What is Import Genius


												Import Genius reveals the trading activities of importers and exporters around the world.								

												We give you hard data about your overseas suppliers and domestic competitors. Using shipping databases from Customs agencies in the United States, Latin America, and India, Import Genius can help you find reliable new trading partners, monitor your competitors’ shipments, and keep an eye on your current suppliers and customers.								

												Our team of seasoned import-export veterans, cutting-edge software developers, and customer service professionals has worked for years to build the world's most powerful and accessible database of international trade intelligence.								



												We do this for a diverse client base that requires keen insight into international trade.								

												Our customers include some of the world's top importers, exporters, freight forwarders, logistics companies, manufacturers, investment banks, financial analysts, intellectual property attorneys, and more. They use our tools to:								

Research the trade activity of importers and suppliers
Identify and vet new sources for any kind of product
Monitor the competition and their trade connections
Generate sales leads for transportation and logistics companies
Track the activity of publicly-traded companies
Investigate and enforce intellectual property infringement
Ensure exclusive agent compliance




Who Uses Import Genius

Sourcing Professionals...

			Use our service to view shipping histories for suppliers.		

			We provide access to detailed customs records, letting you verify suppliers' true shipping volumes and U.S. customer lists. You can also look up your competing import firms to find where they buy their goods.		
+ Learn More
Competitive Intelligence Analysts...

			Use our service to learn where rivals source products.		

			We give clear insights into the importing volumes, new product releases, and broader competitive dynamics of your industry.		
+ Learn More


Sales & Marketing Teams...

			Use our service to generate sales prospects.		

			We give you the tools to target importers based on product type, location, shipping volumes, and more.		
+ Learn More
Financial Analysts...

			Use our service to monitor public companies' imports.		

			We offer rare data on the success or failure of new product launches, shipping trends and other operating data for companies in any industry.		
+ Learn More



Available Data Fields

Import Genius Data Fields

												By collecting the ocean freight bill of lading for all U.S. imports in our database, Import Genius provides unprecedented access to near real-time information on virtually every industry and company importing goods into the country.								

												For each shipment entering the U.S. by ocean, we provide access to the following information.								
Additional Fields Available for Some Shipments:

Phone Number
Fax Number
Email
Contact Person



List of Data Fields



ConsigneeThe company importing the shipment into the U.S.Consignee AddressThe address of the company importing the shipment into the U.S.ShipperThe overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Shipper AddressThe address of the overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Product DescriptionThe exporter's description of the shipment as it appears on the bill of lading or shipping manifestGross WeightThe gross weight of the shipment, excluding the weight of the actual container. This can appear in either pounds or kilograms at the discretion of the exporterNumber Of UnitsThe quantity of boxes customs would find if they were to open the shipment for inspection.VolumeThe volume of the shipment, generally defined in cubic meters or container base measurements (CBM)Arrival DateThe date the shipment arrives within the customs territory of the U.S.Foreign PortThe last port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.Country Of OriginThe country of the last foreign port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.U.S. PortThe U.S. port where the shipment enters the customs territory of the U.S.Carrier CodeThe four digit Standard Carrier Alpha Code of the ocean carrier or freight forwarder managing the transit of the shipmentVoyage NumberA unique code assigned to that particular sailing of the ship between two portsVessel NameThe name of the ship transporting the shipmentShip Registered InThe country where the ship is officially registeredBill Of Lading NumberThe unique number assigned to this particular shipment by the ocean carrier or freight forwarderContainer NumberThe unique number assigned to the ocean shipping container carrying the shipment in questionMarks & NumbersAny text or numbers appearing on the cartons 

















Import Genius

How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Our Trade Data Blog
Search
Latin Trade Data

Import Genius Reviews & Press Coverage
Who Uses Import Genius
Contact Us



Latest Posts




                                    Trump Properties Have…                                




                                    India, US palm oil imports…                                




                                    Chilean salmon exports…                                




                                    Limited Plan Now Available                                




                                    Solar panels: imports…                                




Company Profiles



                                    Four Seasons Resort C/o Tropical Sh                                



                                    Nekeita Peters                                



                                    Beauty Manufacturing Soutions Corp                                



                                    Thien Kim Long An Co., Ltd O B Truo                                



                                    Zannini Poland                                











                     
                                            109,970,574  Records in our database and counting





Customer Support Team: 

                    Tel:  855-573-9976
                    International: +1 480-745-3396
                    Fax: +1 602-428-9400
info@importgenius.com

                    8901 E Pima Center Pkwy, 
		    Suite 105 
                    Scottsdale, AZ 85258


Shanghai, China:

                    Tel: +86-21-63806036


                    Mobile No.: +86-13671737628
                    Fax Number: +86-21-63806036


Shenzhen, China
                    
                            Tel: +86-755-89517585
                            Mob: +86-13925258002
                            Fax: +86-755-89517585                



Have questions? We'll reply quickly!





									         		Type your info below								         		











Message



Submit

Processing, please wait ...

 

 

                Trainings, Demos, and General Contact All Available            
Or Call Us:
Service:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Sales:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Back to top

 





All Rights Reserved. Copyright © 2017. Trade Data Services, Inc. 0.4943
 






 

 




We're Offline
Please leave us a message



To chat with a representative of Import Genius, your browser needs to be Internet Explorer 9 or higher. Please fill out the form below and a representative will contact you as soon as possible.



Name



Email



Phone



Message



Send




X





















Wafer Works Corp in Westgate, NY
































 












Plans




Limited




Plus




Premium








            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 3-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 3-months from the current date.




            PlusSmall & Medium Business



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 12-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 12-months from the current date.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies




            Premium            Empire Builder



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
You'll have access to our entire database of shipping manifests of U.S. Ocean freight imports going back to November 2006.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies





            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
Our Limited Plan lets you monitor the shipping activities of any three companies across all our databases. Be the first to know when your target company clears a shipment through customs in one of the countries we track.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plans, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

10 Company Searches Per Day
10 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan which allows more searches.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 1k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Company Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Usage

25 Searches Per Day
25 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Premium plan which allows more searches.
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 25 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches
If you need to track more than 5 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Usage

50 Searches Per Day
 
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 50 companies in our database each month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, contact the Sales Department to purchase more credits and export additional shipping records.
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches





             Plus             Small & Medium Business



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Premium            Empire Builder



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.
Dedicated Research Assistant
An experienced trade data specialist will serve as your dedicated account manager to locate hard-to-reach data, perform searches and compile reports on your behalf.




            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.







X












                   Home                





                        How It Works                    



                            U.S. Data                        

                            Additional Countries                        

                            Our Datasets                        

                            Our Clients                        

                            IG Reviews                        

                            Videos                        

                            Pictures                        

                            Presentation                        



                   Plans & Pricing                

                    Search                

                  Contact Us                
Live Chat				

                    Free Demo                

                    Sign In                

                    Join Now                











English
中文
French










English



中文



French



 

Get global shipment alerts for Wafer Works Corp, $9.95 /month

Processing, please wait ...







Cardholder's Name


Tell us your Full Name



Credit Card No. 








Enter a valid Card No.



Exp. Date

1 January
2 February
3 March
4 April
5 May
6 June
7 July
8 August
9 September
10 October
11 November
12 December




2017
2018
2019
2020
2021
2022
2023
2024
2025
2026



Postal Code / Zip


(or Postal Code if not in the USA)




  Terms of Service




Submit















			                                                Service: 855-573-9976 
                        Sales: +1-855-573-9976

 Live Chat

Choose Language
 English
 中文
 French




 



Hi, may I help you with something?

An ImportGenius.com sales agent is available to answer your question.


							Chat Live Now						

						No, thanks.					







Sign Up






Home
How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Search
Contact Us


Live Chat

2
  



 



Wafer Works Corp

Wafer Works Corporation exports to Kayex A Division Of Tps through the port of New York, New York        





 Call +1 (480) 744 2559




Import Genius






                                Our bill of lading data reveals the trading activities of Wafer Works Corp and millions of other manufacturers.                            


Learn More
Join Now




Request a Demo





Would you like to schedule a free demo?
We'd love to show you international trade data relevant to your own business.










Name




Email





Phone






Schedule A Free Demo


















Play muted


International Trade Starts With Our Data









Other companies in our database

 PING INC.
 CVS PHARMACY INC
 DISNEY THEME PARK MERCHANDISE (OLD
 DELL PRODUCTS
 TRANSITYRE FRANCE S.A. MICHELIN EXP
















View Sample Shipment Records
Shipment Alert Subscription
Contact This Company



Sign Up

 





Sample shipment record for Wafer Works Corp
Wafer Works Corporation exports to Kayex A Division Of Tps through the port of New York, New York


                                Bill of Lading                            





Manufacturer / Shipper
Consignee



WAFER WORKS CORPORATION
NO 1 LANE 445 MEI SHI RD SEC 2YANG 
MEI TAOYUAN TAIWAN  R O C          
TEL 03 4815001 FAX 03 4815002


KAYEX A DIVISION OF TPS
KAYEX 1000 MILLSTEAD WAY ROCHESTER 
NY 14624



Notify Party
Marks and Numbers








N/M 
 
 
 
 
N/M 
[6 PKGS=2 PLTS(25 PCS) + 4 W/CASES]
N/M 
 
 
 
 
N/M 
[6 PKGS=2 PLTS(25 PCS) + 4 W/CASES]





Master Bill of Lading Number
Container Number



ZIMUTPE7097434


ZCSU2711517 
ZCSU2663419
ZCSU2711517 
ZCSU2663419


Product Description




CRYSTAL REMOVAL SYSTEMQUARTZ CRUCIBLECRYSTAL REMOVAL SYSTEMQUARTZ CRUCIBLE
CRYSTAL REMOVAL SYSTEMQUARTZ CRUCIBLECRYSTAL REMOVAL SYSTEMQUARTZ CRUCIBLE









Bill of LadingAWQE2901187E    Arrival Date2009-02-22Weight (LB)21,776Weight (KG)9,898Quantity20 PKGContainer Count2Voyage No.22EPort of LoadingCHI LUNGPort of DischargeNEW YORK, NEW YORKVessel NameZIM PIRAEUSCarrier CodeAWQECountry Of OriginChina TaiwanPlace Of ReceiptTAOYUAN, TAIWAN 





Subscribe to access the complete shipping history for Wafer Works Corp. Join Now 







How will your business use our trade data?
If you're involved in international trade, our database of shipping manifests will help you find opportunities to grow your business.

Find Trading Partners You Can Trust
Monitor Competitors' Shipping Activities
Connect With Sales Prospects














                            "Very informative and great site and so quick. Pretty slick."
                        







Betty Fatzie

                                                                    President,                                 
                                                                    Lab Products, Inc.                                
                            






                            "The service was great, with a reasonable price and great results. We have now started using another supplier from China. We just ordered our first container from the new supplier and with the savings it more than paid for the ImportGenius.com service on the first container load."
                        







Cleve Kurz

                                
                                                                    Gifford Monument Works                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is not merely an investment for our organization, it’s a vital instrument to effectively manage our time. It has afforded us the ability to quickly segment, target and position ourselves in front of prospective clients. Thank you, Import Genius!"
                        







David Bryant

                                                                    Director of Business Development,                                 
                                                                    John S. James Co.                                
                            






                            "Import Genius data is fantastic for evaluating component manufacturers in China."
                        







Sanjay Dastoor

                                
                                                                    BoostedBoards.com                                
                            






                            "We have confidence that we're working with the best manufacturers in part because Import Genius showed us that they already supply some of the world's top brands"
                        







Yaniv Masjedi

                                                                    Vice President,                                 
                                                                    Nextiva.com                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is a highly informative tool for monitoring public companies' operating activities. It is an invaluable part of our research."
                        







Eric DeLamarter

                                                                    Managing Partner,                                 
                                                                    Half Moon Capital                                
                            






                            "We find new clients for our customs brokerage in the ImportGenius database almost every day"
                        







Jayson Gispan

                                                                    Customs Brokerage Operations Manager,                                 
                                                                    Flexport.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius is a great research tool. We use it to evaluate manufacturers to make sure we are working with only the highest quality, most reliable suppliers"
                        







Chris Friedland

                                                                    Founder / CEO,                                 
                                                                    Build.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius gave us visibility into the actual shipping histories of the manufacturers we were evaluating and helped us feel comfortable we were working with the best suppliers in China."
                        







Morena Simitic

                                                                    COO,                                 
                                                                    BellaBeat.com                                
                            
























Shipment Alert Subscription



                        Get e-mail alerts when Wafer Works Corp has new shipments.                        

Processing, please wait ...









Submit












Contact Wafer Works Corp







 



Name



Business



Email



Phone




Submit




Processing, please wait ...

 

 





Features



Save and Share Reports
Easily get your searches out of Import Genius and into your team’s hands for further analysis. Export your findings to XLS or CSV, or send reports via email. It’s the simple things that make our trade data even more valuable to you.



See the Supply Chain
Visual Mapping shows you exactly how your target companies and their trading partners connect. Search by shipper and see everyone they’ve shipped to. Or search by consignee and see all their suppliers. Zoom in on any company to see their own trading network. Dive deep into international trade and discover the links in anyone’s supply chain.



Get Real-time Shipment Alerts
Stay on top of your competitors, suppliers, and customers with real-time alerts. Just set up a search and get an email whenever a new shipment matches your terms. Import Genius lets you know the moment they bring in a rival product or start shipping to a new partner.








Wafer Works Corp
You've viewed 20 profile pages on Import Genius, which is the most we allow for free. Sign up for ImportGenius to get more details on over 3 million importers and exporters. It only takes seconds.






Sign Up for Import Genius! 








Plans




Limited
Monitor Your Competitors




Recommended Plan
Plus
Small & Medium Business




Premium
Empire Builder






Price





$
99
594
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
199
1,194
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
399
2,394
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    







Data




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details






Usage





Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches

View Details





25 Searches Per Day
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches

View Details





50 Searches Per Day
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches

View Details






Features


 


Visual Mapping
View Details




Visual Mapping
View Details






Support




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details





Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Dedicated Research Assistant

View Details






  






View All U.S. Imports
Instantly search 109,970,574 ocean freight records to monitor U.S. importers, research suppliers, generate sales leads and more.


As Featured In





















What is Import Genius





Who Uses Import Genius





Available Data Fields







What is Import Genius


												Import Genius reveals the trading activities of importers and exporters around the world.								

												We give you hard data about your overseas suppliers and domestic competitors. Using shipping databases from Customs agencies in the United States, Latin America, and India, Import Genius can help you find reliable new trading partners, monitor your competitors’ shipments, and keep an eye on your current suppliers and customers.								

												Our team of seasoned import-export veterans, cutting-edge software developers, and customer service professionals has worked for years to build the world's most powerful and accessible database of international trade intelligence.								



												We do this for a diverse client base that requires keen insight into international trade.								

												Our customers include some of the world's top importers, exporters, freight forwarders, logistics companies, manufacturers, investment banks, financial analysts, intellectual property attorneys, and more. They use our tools to:								

Research the trade activity of importers and suppliers
Identify and vet new sources for any kind of product
Monitor the competition and their trade connections
Generate sales leads for transportation and logistics companies
Track the activity of publicly-traded companies
Investigate and enforce intellectual property infringement
Ensure exclusive agent compliance




Who Uses Import Genius

Sourcing Professionals...

			Use our service to view shipping histories for suppliers.		

			We provide access to detailed customs records, letting you verify suppliers' true shipping volumes and U.S. customer lists. You can also look up your competing import firms to find where they buy their goods.		
+ Learn More
Competitive Intelligence Analysts...

			Use our service to learn where rivals source products.		

			We give clear insights into the importing volumes, new product releases, and broader competitive dynamics of your industry.		
+ Learn More


Sales & Marketing Teams...

			Use our service to generate sales prospects.		

			We give you the tools to target importers based on product type, location, shipping volumes, and more.		
+ Learn More
Financial Analysts...

			Use our service to monitor public companies' imports.		

			We offer rare data on the success or failure of new product launches, shipping trends and other operating data for companies in any industry.		
+ Learn More



Available Data Fields

Import Genius Data Fields

												By collecting the ocean freight bill of lading for all U.S. imports in our database, Import Genius provides unprecedented access to near real-time information on virtually every industry and company importing goods into the country.								

												For each shipment entering the U.S. by ocean, we provide access to the following information.								
Additional Fields Available for Some Shipments:

Phone Number
Fax Number
Email
Contact Person



List of Data Fields



ConsigneeThe company importing the shipment into the U.S.Consignee AddressThe address of the company importing the shipment into the U.S.ShipperThe overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Shipper AddressThe address of the overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Product DescriptionThe exporter's description of the shipment as it appears on the bill of lading or shipping manifestGross WeightThe gross weight of the shipment, excluding the weight of the actual container. This can appear in either pounds or kilograms at the discretion of the exporterNumber Of UnitsThe quantity of boxes customs would find if they were to open the shipment for inspection.VolumeThe volume of the shipment, generally defined in cubic meters or container base measurements (CBM)Arrival DateThe date the shipment arrives within the customs territory of the U.S.Foreign PortThe last port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.Country Of OriginThe country of the last foreign port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.U.S. PortThe U.S. port where the shipment enters the customs territory of the U.S.Carrier CodeThe four digit Standard Carrier Alpha Code of the ocean carrier or freight forwarder managing the transit of the shipmentVoyage NumberA unique code assigned to that particular sailing of the ship between two portsVessel NameThe name of the ship transporting the shipmentShip Registered InThe country where the ship is officially registeredBill Of Lading NumberThe unique number assigned to this particular shipment by the ocean carrier or freight forwarderContainer NumberThe unique number assigned to the ocean shipping container carrying the shipment in questionMarks & NumbersAny text or numbers appearing on the cartons 

















Import Genius

How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Our Trade Data Blog
Search
Latin Trade Data

Import Genius Reviews & Press Coverage
Who Uses Import Genius
Contact Us



Latest Posts




                                    Trump Properties Have…                                




                                    India, US palm oil imports…                                




                                    Chilean salmon exports…                                




                                    Limited Plan Now Available                                




                                    Solar panels: imports…                                




Company Profiles



                                    Rapid Aluminum Co Ltd                                



                                    Qingdao O-shen Industry & Trade Cn.                                



                                    Cocera Intl Co., Ltd                                



                                    Maine Coast Smokehouse Llc                                



                                    Amanda Lenore Washburn                                











                     
                                            109,970,574  Records in our database and counting





Customer Support Team: 

                    Tel:  855-573-9976
                    International: +1 480-745-3396
                    Fax: +1 602-428-9400
info@importgenius.com

                    8901 E Pima Center Pkwy, 
		    Suite 105 
                    Scottsdale, AZ 85258


Shanghai, China:

                    Tel: +86-21-63806036


                    Mobile No.: +86-13671737628
                    Fax Number: +86-21-63806036


Shenzhen, China
                    
                            Tel: +86-755-89517585
                            Mob: +86-13925258002
                            Fax: +86-755-89517585                



Have questions? We'll reply quickly!





									         		Type your info below								         		











Message



Submit

Processing, please wait ...

 

 

                Trainings, Demos, and General Contact All Available            
Or Call Us:
Service:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Sales:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Back to top

 





All Rights Reserved. Copyright © 2017. Trade Data Services, Inc. 0.4393
 






 

 




We're Offline
Please leave us a message



To chat with a representative of Import Genius, your browser needs to be Internet Explorer 9 or higher. Please fill out the form below and a representative will contact you as soon as possible.



Name



Email



Phone



Message



Send




X















